Maine, session 132, LD117.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Community-based services; domestic violence and sexual assault.
Notwithstanding any provision of Public Law 2025, chapter 388 to the contrary, any unused
balances of the one-time funding of $3,000,000 in fiscal year 2025-26 and one-time funding
of $3,000,000 in fiscal year 2026-27 appropriated to the Department of Health and Human
Services, Purchased Social Services program under Public Law 2025, chapter 388, Part A
to replace current and anticipated reductions in grants to the department under the federal
victim assistance formula grant program administered by the United States Department of
Justice, Office of Justice Programs, Office for Victims of Crime pursuant to the federal
Victims of Crime Act of 1984 not needed for that purpose must be disbursed in equal
amounts to a statewide coalition of domestic violence resource centers and to a statewide
coalition of sexual assault support centers to support community-based services. The
Department of Health and Human Services shall identify any unused balance as of March
30th of each year to be disbursed pursuant to this section.
Page 1 - 132LR0117(06)